Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1433
Lobbying, defined.

Lobbying shall mean the practice of promoting or opposing for another person, as defined in section 49-1438, the introduction or enactment of legislation or resolutions before the Legislature or the committees or the members thereof, and shall also include the practice of promoting or opposing executive approval of legislation or resolutions.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 33.